Texas, session 891, HB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 24.60035 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60035.  490TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZORIA COUNTY). The 490th Judicial District is composed of Brazoria County. SECTION 2.  The 490th Judicial District is created on the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect September 1, 2026.